Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-638
Motor vehicle, defined.

Motor vehicle shall mean every self-propelled land vehicle, not operated upon rails, except mopeds, self-propelled chairs used by persons who are disabled, and electric personal assistive mobility devices.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 134;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 451.